Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 3. Benefits
§ 27-3-316.
Applicability of regular claim and payment provisions to extended benefits; determination of amount.

Except as otherwise provided by this article and regulation of the commission, regular benefit claim and payment provisions of this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

] apply to extended benefits.

An eligible individual’s weekly extended benefit amount for a week of total unemployment in his eligibility period is equal to his weekly benefit amount payable during the applicable benefit year except as hereafter provided:

If the amount of extended benefits reimbursed by the federal government under the federal-state extended unemployment compensation act is reduced or increased, then an eligible claimant’s weekly and potential maximum extended benefit amount shall be similarly reduced or increased by an amount sufficient to assure that the federal government and the state of Wyoming share the cost on an equal basis. The reduced weekly extended benefit amount, if not a full dollar amount, shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1.00);

The provisions in W.S. 27-3-509(c) which determine the reimbursable rate of certain employers shall not be affected by paragraph (i) of this subsection.

An eligible individual’s total extended benefit amount for his applicable benefit year is the lesser of:

Fifty percent (50%) of his total amount of regular benefits under this article in the applicable benefit year; or

Thirteen (13) times his weekly benefit amount under this article for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year. A reduction in an eligible claimant’s weekly and potential maximum extended benefit amount, resulting from the application of paragraph (b)(i) of this section, will not increase the number of weeks of extended benefit entitlement beyond that specified in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act and if the benefit year of an individual ends within an extended benefit period, the remaining balance of extended benefits the individual is otherwise entitled to receive in that extended benefit period for unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year shall be reduced by the product of the number of weeks he received an amount as trade readjustment allowances within that benefit year multiplied by his weekly extended benefit amount. Extended benefits shall not be reduced below zero by reason of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1986, ch. 56, § 1.

Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act. —

The Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act, referred to in subsection (b)(i), appears as a note to 26 USCS § 3304.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-3-317.
Eligibility for extended benefits; exceptions; qualifications.

An individual is eligible for extended benefits under this article for any week of unemployment in his eligibility period if for that week he qualifies as an exhaustee under W.S.

27-3-315

and meets regular benefit eligibility requirements of this article.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, an individual is not eligible for extended benefits for any week if, pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any state under the interstate benefit payment plan, no extended benefit period is effective that week for that state. This subsection does not apply to the first two (2) weeks that extended benefits are payable to an individual from his extended benefit account for that benefit year pursuant to an interstate claim filed under the interstate benefit payment plan.

An individual not eligible for extended benefits because of failure to comply with the actively seeking work requirements of subsection (d) of this section shall be denied extended benefits until employed in an employee-employer relationship for four (4) weeks beginning the first day of the week following the week in which the failure occurred and wages of not less than four (4) times the extended weekly benefit amount are earned.

For purposes of extended benefit eligibility, an individual is actively seeking work under W.S. 27-3-306(a)(iii) for any week if he:

Has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during the week; and

Furnishes the department with tangible evidence of his effort for that week.

Notwithstanding W.S. 27-3-312(a), suitable work for extended benefit eligibility purposes shall pay gross average weekly wages for work within an individual’s capabilities that:

Exceed the individual’s weekly benefit amount under W.S. 27-3-316(b) plus any supplemental unemployment benefits received under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(17)(D) for that week; and

Are not less than the higher of the minimum wage pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 206(a)(1) excluding any exemptions or the applicable state or local minimum wage.

An individual shall not be denied extended benefits for failure to accept an offer of or apply for suitable work meeting the criteria of subsection (e) of this section if:

It is not offered in writing or not listed with the state employment service; or

The failure is not a denial of regular benefits under W.S. 27-3-312(a) to the extent the criteria of suitability are consistent with subsection (c) of this section; or

He furnishes satisfactory evidence to the department of good employment prospects in his customary occupation within a reasonably short time, in which case the determination of suitable work shall be made in accordance with W.S. 27-3-312(a).

An individual disqualified from benefit entitlement under W.S.

27-3-311

shall be denied extended benefits until requalified as follows:

If disqualified from benefit entitlement under W.S.

27-3-311

(a)(i), (ii) or (iii), the individual shall be employed in an employee-employer relationship for not less than twelve (12) weeks, whether or not consecutive, following the date of disqualification and have earned wages of not less than twelve (12) times his weekly benefit amount for this employment; or

If disqualified from benefit entitlement under W.S. 27-3-311(f), the individual shall be employed in an employee-employer relationship for not less than four (4) weeks, whether or not consecutive, following the date of disqualification and have earned wages of not less than four (4) times his weekly benefit amount for this employment; and

In no event shall an individual receive extended benefits during a period in which he is disqualified from benefit entitlement.

For purposes of extended benefit eligibility and notwithstanding W.S. 27-3-306(d)(iii), earned wages for insured work shall be at least one and five-tenths (1.5) times the high quarter earnings in his base period.

Subsections (c) through (g) of this section shall not apply to weeks of unemployment beginning after March 6, 1993, and before January 1, 1995.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 60, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (g)(ii), substituted “27-3-311(f)” for “27-3-311(c).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment in pursuit of other employment as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 46 ALR5th 659.

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment in pursuit of education or to attend training as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 47 ALR5th 775.

§ 27-3-318.
Payment of benefits accrued by deceased.

The department may pay benefits accrued under this article by a deceased individual to his surviving spouse, children or parents without letters testamentary or letters of administration.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 3; 1939, ch. 124, § 8; 1941, ch. 96, § 3; 1943, ch. 58, § 3; 1945, ch. 81, §§ 3, 4; C.S. 1945, § 54-103; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 3; 1953, ch. 111, § 2; 1955, ch. 230, § 1; 1957, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-24; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 253, §§ 8, 14; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-103

; Laws 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

§ 27-3-319.
Waiver agreements void; exception; assignments void; exemption from levy.

Except as provided by W.S.

27-3-305

,

27-3-320

and

27-3-321

, any agreement to waive, release or commute benefit rights or any other rights under this act is void and any agreement by any employed individual to pay any portion of an employer’s contribution required by this act is void.

Except as provided by W.S.

27-3-305

,

27-3-320

and

27-3-321

, the assignment, transfer, pledge or encumbrance of benefit rights under this act is void.

Benefit rights are exempt from levy, execution, attachment or other debt collection remedy. Benefits received by an individual under this act and not combined with other funds of the recipient are exempt from debt collection remedies except those incurred for necessities furnished to the individual, his spouse or dependents during his unemployment. A waiver of exemptions provided by this subsection is void.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 54-115; W.S. 1957, § 27-36; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-116; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1996, ch. 4, § 2; 1997, ch. 91, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Bankruptcy cases. —

Unpublished decision:

Although unemployment compensation and benefits paid from an employer's retirement plan were exempt under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

27-3-319

and

1-20-110

, the taxes withheld from this income and refunded to the Chapter 7 debtor were not exempt. The taxes were withheld under 26 U.S.C.S. §§ 3402(p)(2) and 3405(c), and under § 3402(a)(1) were deemed to be a “tax.”
2011 Bankr. LEXIS 1631.

Applied

in

Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Laramie Cabs, Inc., 700 P.2d 399,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1985); Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes duress by employer or former employer vitiating employee's release of employer from claims arising out of employment, 30 ALR4th 294.

§ 27-3-320.
Benefit withholding for federal income taxes; department notification; procedure; withholding status election.

The department shall at the time of filing, advise an individual filing an initial claim for benefits payable under this act that:

Benefits are subject to federal income tax;

Estimated federal income tax payments are required by the federal internal revenue service;

Effective January 1, 1997 and each year thereafter, federal income tax may be deducted and withheld from benefits at the amount specified by federal law upon election by the individual; and

Previously elected federal income tax withholding status under this section may be changed once during any one (1) benefit year.

Effective January 1, 1997 and each year thereafter and upon request by an individual filing an initial claim for benefits payable under this act, the department shall, subject to subsection (d) of this section, deduct and withhold federal income tax from benefits payable to the individual in the amount specified by federal law and in accordance with procedures specified by the United States department of labor and the internal revenue service. Amounts deducted and withheld pursuant to this section shall remain in the fund until transferred to the internal revenue service as payment of federal income tax.

The department shall by rule and regulation establish procedures for administering this section and shall permit an individual to change his withholding status once during each benefit year.

Amounts shall not be deducted and withheld under this section until amounts are deducted and withheld for any overpayment, child support obligation or any other amount required or allowed to be deducted and withheld under this act.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 4, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-3-321.
Disclosure of supplemental nutrition assistance program overissuance required; notification; amount withheld; payment; applicability of provisions.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether or not he owes an uncollected overissuance of supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits as defined in section 13(c)(1) of the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008. The department shall notify the department of family services of any individual who discloses that he owes an uncollected overissuance and who is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The department shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes an uncollected overissuance of supplemental nutrition assistance benefits:

The amount specified by the individual to the department to be deducted and withheld under this section;

The amount determined pursuant to an agreement under section 13(c)(3)(A) of the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 and submitted to the department of family services; or

Any amount otherwise required to be deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation pursuant to section 13(c)(3)(B) of the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, whichever is greater.

Any amount deducted and withheld under this section shall be paid by the department to the department of family services.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by the individual to the department of family services as repayment of the individual’s uncollected overissuance.

For purposes of this section, the term “unemployment compensation” means any benefits payable under this act and any amounts payable by the department pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance or allowances with respect to unemployment.

This section applies only if arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the department of family services for the administrative costs incurred by the department under this section which are attributable to the repayment of uncollected overissuances to the department of family services.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 91, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a) and (b), substituted “supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits” for “food stamp coupons” and in (a), (b)(ii) and (b)(iii), substituted “Food and Nutrition Act of 2008” for “Food Stamp Act of 1977.”

Editor's notes. —

The Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 is codified as
7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).